dev/verbs2.dix
    <pardef n="c-pres-el-fin">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnp"/></r></p><par n="x-pres-el-fin-p"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnf"/></r></p><par n="x-pres-el-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- ====================================================================== -->
    <!--                 N O N - F I N I T E  ·  E N D I N G S                  --> 
    <!-- ====================================================================== -->

    <pardef n="ø-pres-el-prc">
      <e><p><l>ում</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ելիք</l><r><s n="fut2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ելու</l><r><s n="fut1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ելիս</l><r><s n="proc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="ø-pres-al-prc">
      <e><p><l>ում</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ալիք</l><r><s n="fut2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ալու</l><r><s n="fut1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ալիս</l><r><s n="proc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="ø-pres-cn-prc">
      <e><par n="ø-pres-el-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø-aor-xx-prc">
      <e><p><l>ել</l><r><s n="pprf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-pres-el-prc">
      <e><p><l>ել</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ող</l><r><s n="pagn"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ած</l><r><s n="prsl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ի</l><r><s n="conneg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-pres-al-prc">
      <e><p><l>ալ</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ա</l><r><s n="conneg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-pres-cn-prc">
      <e><p><l>ել</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ող</l><r><s n="pagn"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-aor-al-prc">
      <e><p><l>ող</l><r><s n="pagn"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ած</l><r><s n="prsl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-aor-cn-prc">
      <e><p><l>ած</l><r><s n="prsl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- ====================================================================== -->
    <!--  --> 
    <!-- ====================================================================== -->

    <!-- Verbs with the -al paradigm ========================================== -->

    <!-- Transitive -->

    <pardef n="ø-v-tv-aor-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="ø-aor-xx-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø-v-tv-pres-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="ø-pres-al-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-tv-aor-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-al-prc"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-al-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-tv-pres-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="n-pres-al-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Intransitive -->

    <pardef n="ø-v-iv-aor-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="ø-aor-xx-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø-v-iv-pres-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="ø-pres-al-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-iv-aor-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-al-prc"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-al-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-iv-pres-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="n-pres-al-prc"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="n-pres-al-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c-v-iv-pres-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="c-pres-al-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø-v-iv-caus-aor-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="ø-aor-xx-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø-v-iv-caus-pres-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="ø-pres-al-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-iv-caus-aor-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-al-prc"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-al-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="n-pres-al-prc"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="n-pres-al-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c-v-iv-caus-pres-al">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="c-pres-al-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Verbs with the -el paradigm ========================================== -->

    <!-- Intransitive -->

    <pardef n="ø-v-iv-aor-el">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="ø-aor-xx-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø-v-iv-pres-el">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="ø-pres-el-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-iv-aor-el">
      <!--<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-el-prc"/></e>-->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-el-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-iv-pres-el">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="n-pres-el-prc"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="n-pres-el-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c-v-iv-pres-el">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="c-pres-el-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø-v-iv-caus-aor-el">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="ø-aor-xx-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ø-v-iv-caus-pres-el">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="ø-pres-el-prc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-iv-caus-aor-el">
      <!--<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-el-prc"/></e>-->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="n-aor-el-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-el">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="n-pres-el-prc"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="n-pres-el-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c-v-iv-caus-pres-el">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="caus"/></r></p><par n="c-pres-el-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>



  </pardefs>

    <e lm="թարշամել"><p><l>թարշամ</l><r>թարշամել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թարշամել"><p><l>թարշամ</l><r>թարշամել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թարշամել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>թարշամ</l><r>թարշամել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թարշամել"><p><l>կթարշամ</l><r>թարշամել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թռնել"><p><l>թռնեցն</l><r>թռնել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թռնել"><p><l>թռցր</l><r>թռնել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թռնել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>թռցր</l><r>թռնել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թռնել"><p><l>կթռնեցն</l><r>թռնել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թռչել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>թռչեցնցն</l><r>թռչել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="լինել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>լին</l><r>լինել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հասնել"><p><l>հասնեցն</l><r>հասնել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հասնել"><p><l>հասցր</l><r>հասնել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հասնել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>հասցր</l><r>հասնել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հասնել"><p><l>կհասնեցն</l><r>հասնել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հեգել"><p><l>հեգ</l><r>հեգել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հեգել"><p><l>հեգ</l><r>հեգել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հեգել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>հեգ</l><r>հեգել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հեգել"><p><l>կհեգ</l><r>հեգել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="ճաքել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ճաքեցնցն</l><r>ճաքել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="մտաբերել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>մտաբեր</l><r>մտաբերել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="սեղմել"><p><l>սեղմ</l><r>սեղմել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="սեղմել"><p><l>սեղմ</l><r>սեղմել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="սեղմել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>սեղմ</l><r>սեղմել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="սեղմել"><p><l>կսեղմ</l><r>սեղմել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="վախել"><p><l>վախեցն</l><r>վախել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="վախել"><p><l>վախցր</l><r>վախել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="վախել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>վախցր</l><r>վախել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-aor-el"/></e>
    <e lm="վախել"><p><l>կվախեցն</l><r>վախել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="փայլել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>փայլեցնցն</l><r>փայլել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="քավել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>քավ</l><r>քավել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="գոռել"><p><l>գոռ</l><r>գոռել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="գոռել"><p><l>գոռաց</l><r>գոռել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="եռել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>եռ</l><r>եռել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="ընթանել"><p><l>ընթանացն</l><r>ընթանել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="ընթանել"><p><l>ընթացցր</l><r>ընթանել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="ընթանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ընթանացնցն</l><r>ընթանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="ընթանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ընթացցր</l><r>ընթանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="ընթանել"><p><l>կընթանացն</l><r>ընթանել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="լողել"><p><l>լող</l><r>լողել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="լողել"><p><l>լողաց</l><r>լողել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="լողել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>լողաց</l><r>լողել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="լողել"><p><l>կլող</l><r>լողել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="խեթել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>խեթ</l><r>խեթել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="հեռանել"><p><l>հեռանացն</l><r>հեռանել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="հեռանել"><p><l>հեռացցր</l><r>հեռանել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="հեռանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>հեռացցր</l><r>հեռանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="հեռանել"><p><l>կհեռանացն</l><r>հեռանել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="հղփանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>հղփանացնցն</l><r>հղփանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="մնել"><p><l>մն</l><r>մնել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="մնել"><p><l>մնաց</l><r>մնել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="մնել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>մնաց</l><r>մնել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="մնել"><p><l>կմն</l><r>մնել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="ոխանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ոխան</l><r>ոխանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="վախենել"><p><l>վախենացն</l><r>վախենել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="վախենել"><p><l>վախեցցր</l><r>վախենել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-caus-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="վախենել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>վախեցցր</l><r>վախենել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="վախենել"><p><l>կվախենացն</l><r>վախենել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="ցավել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ցավացնցն</l><r>ցավել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="փութել"><p><l>փութ</l><r>փութել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="փութել"><p><l>փութաց</l><r>փութել</r></p><par n="ø-v-iv-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="փութել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>փութաց</l><r>փութել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-aor-al"/></e>
    <e lm="փութել"><p><l>կփութ</l><r>փութել</r></p><par n="c-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
